Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB727.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the State-owned Assets and Broadband Services Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Fixed broadband service." An Internet connection provided through a link to a stationary location."Mobile broadband service." An Internet connection provided through a link to locations that are not stationary.12345678910111213141516171819 "Qualified provider." A provider of mobile broadband service that has obtained all governmental approvals required for the provision of fixed broadband service in the unserved area or underserved area in which it seeks to provide the service."Underserved area." An area within this Commonwealth that is demonstrated to have limited access to fixed broadband services or mobile broadband services."Unserved area." An area within this Commonwealth that is demonstrated to not have access to fixed broadband services or mobile broadband services.Section 3. Inventory of State-owned assets.Under the act of June 15, 1972 (P.L.395, No.117), entitled "An act providing for an inventory of all Commonwealth real property, except highway rights-of-way to be prepared by the Department of Property and Supplies, for its availability to the public, for its updating, and for cooperation by all State governmental agencies; and making an appropriation," and section 508(b) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, the department shall include in its inventories and surveys of real estate structures and assets information on possible use of those assets for fixed broadband services or mobile broadband services. The information shall be used by the department or its designee when analyzing resources available in providing broadband services in unserved areas and underserved areas.Section 4. Inventory of county-owned assets.(a) Preparation of inventories.--A county may prepare and periodically update an inventory of county-owned assets that are available and may be used to provide broadband services in unserved areas and underserved areas.20250SB0727PN0742 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Transmission to department.--A county inventory prepared under subsection (a) may be transmitted to the department and shall be included in the information used by the department under section 3 when analyzing resources available to provide broadband services in unserved areas and underserved areas.Section 5. Lease or conveyance of State-owned assets.(a) Licensing.--Subject to the guidelines adopted by the department under section 7, the State agency having responsibility for a State-owned asset for fixed broadband services or mobile broadband services in an unserved area or underserved area may lease or convey a license or other interest in the asset to a qualified provider in order to permit the use of the asset by the qualified provider in its deployment of fixed broadband services or mobile broadband services within the unserved area or underserved area or portion of that unserved area or underserved area.(b) Evidence of compliance.--The requirement under subsection (a) is subject to the qualified provider presenting to the State agency evidence of compliance with structural, permitting and other guidelines under section 7, which shall be reviewed by the department or its designee.Section 6. Broadband Services Restricted Account.(a) Establishment.--The Broadband Services Restricted Account is established in the General Fund. The money in the restricted account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of deploying high-speed broadband services in unserved areas and underserved areas.(b) Funding.--The following shall be deposited into the restricted account established under subsection (a):(1) All revenue generated from leases, licenses or other 20250SB0727PN0742 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interests in assets authorized by this act.(2) All revenue generated from the contract entered into between the department and a wireless infrastructure program manager on August 23, 2019, and identified by the department as Contract Number 4400021522.(3) All revenue generated from any other contract or agreement entered into between the department and a wireless infrastructure program manager for any of the following purposes:(i) to analyze and market Commonwealth-owned assets, a neutral host system, for revenue-generating purposes;(ii) to manage the occupancy, revenues and expenses associated with each asset;(iii) to construct or, through agreement with a service provider, facilitate the construction of new telecommunication equipment on Commonwealth-owned land, facilities or within rights-of-way;(iv) to retrofit or facilitate the upgrade of existing telecommunication equipment, including, but not limited to, space on any previously constructed towers and buildings; and(v) to enter into site occupancy agreements for assets and telecommunication equipment with service providers that will facilitate the deployment of broadband services to urban and rural consumers.Section 7. Departmental guidelines.The department or its designee shall adopt guidelines for the following:(1) Qualifications for broadband service providers.(2) Negotiating and finalizing site occupancy 20250SB0727PN0742 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreements.Section 8. Approvals.The department or its designee shall identify an appropriate timeline of no more than 90 days for approval of site occupancy agreements.Section 9. Statewide Mobile Radio and Microwave System.(a) Jurisdiction.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall have jurisdiction over the Statewide Mobile Radio and Microwave System described in the act of December 5, 1996 (P.L.921, No.148), known as the Capital Budget Project Itemization Act for 1996-1997.(b) Allocation of proceeds.--Proceeds from the lease or licensing of a tower or other asset of the Statewide Mobile Radio and Microwave System shall be used for the purpose of maintaining and improving the system.Section 10. Applicability.This act shall not apply to:(1) The Pennsylvania State Police.(2) The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0727PN0742 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021